Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1031
Instructor, defined.

Instructor means a person licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act to teach any or all of the practices of cosmetology in a school of cosmetology or an apprentice salon.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 20;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-359;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 293.